Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-145
Poor person; county where found; action to recover costs; when authorized.

If a poor person, by reason of sickness or disease, or by neglect of the authorities of the county in which he or she has a legal settlement, or for any other sufficient cause, cannot be removed, then the county taking charge of such individual may sue for, and recover from the county to which such individual belongs, the amount expended for and in behalf of such poor person and in taking care of such person.

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 15.